Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2063.
hereby enacts as follows:CHAPTER 1PRELIMINARY PROVISIONSSection 101. Short title.This act shall be known and may be cited as the Clean Fuels Standards Act.Section 102. Findings and declarations.The General Assembly finds and declares as follows:(1) According to the most recent Greenhouse Gas Inventory issued by the department, the transportation sector 20250HB2063PN2647 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 and heating fuel sector are the second and third largest sources of greenhouse gas emissions in this Commonwealth.(2) Through the development and implementation of clean fuels standards for transportation fuel and heating fuel, this act is intended to:(i) Reduce greenhouse gas emissions from the transportation sector and heating fuel sector.(ii) Incentivize production of clean fuels for the transportation and heating fuel sectors within this Commonwealth through a system of credits, which can be sold through private transactions to entities that are required to reduce the carbon intensity of transportation fuels and heating fuels supplied to and used in this Commonwealth.(3) This act is intended to be technology neutral and not to exclude any clean fuel or any specific type of transportation fuel or heating fuel.(4) Implementation of clean fuels standards will increase the optionality of available transportation fuels and heating fuels in this Commonwealth and increase overall fuel resilience and grid reliability.Section 103. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Agricultural co-product." A secondary or incidental product derived from the processing or use of an agricultural product, including, but not limited to, plant residue, animal waste, distiller's grains, oilseed meal or another material suitable for conversion to transportation fuel or heating fuel.20250HB2063PN2647 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 "Agricultural products." Crops, livestock or other farm-based commodities that are grown, raised, harvested or produced for use as food, feed, fiber, fuel or industrial raw material or other materials suitable for conversion to transportation or heating fuel."ASTM." The American Society for Testing and Materials International."Board." The Clean Fuels Standards Board established under section 301."Carbon dioxide equivalent." A unit of measurement that is used to standardize the effects of various greenhouse gases and is calculated using Equation A-1 in 40 CFR Pt. 98 Subpt. A (relating to general provision). Carbon dioxide equivalent may be stated as CO2e."Carbon intensity." The life cycle emissions per unit of fuel energy expressed in grams of carbon dioxide equivalent per megajoule, supplied to and used in this Commonwealth, as calculated under the GREET model adopted by the board."Carbon intensity target." The carbon intensity value for a given compliance year that is used to calculate the credits and deficits accrued by a program participant as set by the clean fuels standard."Clean fuel." A fuel sold or supplied for use in this Commonwealth that has a carbon intensity below the clean fuels standards as established by the board, including, but not limited to:(1) Electricity generated from alternative energy sources, as defined in section 2 of the act of November 30, 2004 (P.L.1672, No.213), known as the Alternative Energy Portfolio Standards Act, and in accordance with the act of 20250HB2063PN2647 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 April 9, 1929 (P.L.177, No.175), known as The Administrative Code of 1929.(2) Renewable natural gas, including, but not limited to, biogas derived from landfill gas, municipal solid waste, industrial and food waste, wastewater treatment material, waste mine methane, agricultural products, agricultural co-products and animal manure.(3) Renewable propane.(4) Hydrogen.(5) Hythane.(6) Liquid fuels, including, but not limited to, liquid fuels derived from agricultural products and agricultural co-products such as biodiesel, renewable diesel, ethanol and renewable gasoline.(7) Any of the fuels enumerated under paragraph (6) and generated from co-processing with petroleum-based fuels."Clean fuels standard." The schedule of carbon intensity targets to which a program participant must abide, in accordance with:(1) Section 501(b) for transportation fuels.(2) Section 502(b) for heating fuels."Compliance year." The period beginning January 1 and ending December 31 of the same year."Credit." As follows:(1) A quantitative measure of the amount of CO2e that a fuel supplier produced below the carbon intensity target in a given compliance year.(2) A credit shall be expressed in metric tons of CO2e.(3) For a fuel with a carbon intensity below the applicable carbon intensity target, a credit shall be 20250HB2063PN2647 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 calculated by multiplying the difference between the applicable carbon intensity target of the fuel in a given compliance year and the carbon intensity of the fuel and the amount in megajoules of that fuel used in this Commonwealth."Credit generator." A fuel supplier that generates credits through first production or import of clean fuel for use in this Commonwealth."Deficit." As follows:(1) A quantitative measure of the amount of CO2e that a fuel supplier produced above the carbon intensity target in a given compliance year.(2) A deficit shall be expressed in metric tons of CO2e.(3) For a fuel with a carbon intensity above the applicable carbon intensity target, a deficit shall be calculated by multiplying the difference between the carbon intensity of the fuel and the applicable carbon intensity target in a given compliance year and the amount in megajoules of that fuel used in this Commonwealth."Deliverable fuel." A liquid fuel or gaseous fuel used for the purpose of transportation fuel or heating fuel conveyed by a vehicle from a wholesaler or to an end user of the product."Department." The Department of Environmental Protection of the Commonwealth."Fuel." A transportation fuel, including aviation fuel, or a heating fuel."Fuel pathway." A detailed description of all stages of a fuel's production and delivery for use, including feedstock generation, production, distribution and combustion or use by the consumer that is used to calculate the life-cycle emissions of a fuel.20250HB2063PN2647 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 "Fuel supplier." An entity that produces or imports a fuel for use in this Commonwealth."GREET model." The Research and Development Greenhouse Gases, Regulated Emissions and Energy Use in Technologies model developed by the Argonne National Laboratory as of the effective date of this definition, including any subsequent versions adopted by the Argonne National Laboratory that are then adopted by the board in accordance with this act."Heating fuel." A fuel used to heat the interior space of a building."Heating fuel baseline." The petroleum-only portion of the aggregate average carbon intensity of heating fuel supplied to and used in this Commonwealth in 2005."Hythane." Any combination of compressed natural gas and hydrogen."Life-cycle emissions." The total aggregate greenhouse gas emissions resulting from all stages of a fuel pathway, expressed as gCO2e, for a specific fuel."Motor vehicle." As defined in 75 Pa.C.S. § 102 (relating to definitions)."Obligated party." A fuel supplier that generates deficits through first production or import of a fuel for use in this Commonwealth."Program participant." An obligated party or a credit generator that, on a mandatory or an opt-in basis, abides by the requirements of this act."Project credit." A credit generated from a project at a refinery, hydrogen production facility supplying a refinery, crude oil production facility or natural gas production facility associated with the production of transportation fuels and 20250HB2063PN2647 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 heating fuels supplied to and used in this Commonwealth that reduce the carbon intensity of a fuel compared to the transportation fuel baseline and heating fuel baseline established in accordance with this act."Project operator." A program participant that generates project credits through eligible projects in accordance with this act."Secretary." The Secretary of Environmental Protection of the Commonwealth."Sustainable aviation fuel." A liquid transportation fuel that:(1) is derived from biomass, waste streams, renewable energy sources or gaseous carbon oxides;(2) consists of synthesized hydrocarbons; and(3) meets the requirements of ASTM D7566 or the co-processing provisions of ASTM D1655."Technology neutral." Not giving preference to one technology, feedstock or fuel production or process pathway over another."Trading program." The Fair Market Credit Trading Program established under section 701(a)."Transportation fuel." As follows:(1) Any source of energy used for the operation of a motor vehicle in this Commonwealth that meets applicable standards and specifications.(2) The term includes sustainable aviation fuel."Transportation fuel baseline." The petroleum-only portion of the aggregate average carbon intensity of on-road gasoline and diesel fuel supplied to and used in this Commonwealth in 2005.20250HB2063PN2647 - 8 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 "Verifier." An independent third party accredited by the department to carry out the duties described in section 703(e).CHAPTER 3CLEAN FUELS STANDARDS BOARDSection 301. Establishment.The Clean Fuels Standards Board is established within the department.Section 302. Composition.(a) Members.--The board shall consist of the following members:(1) The secretary or a designee of the secretary who shall be an employee of the department.(2) The Secretary of Agriculture or a designee of the Secretary of Agriculture who shall be an employee of the Department of Agriculture.(3) The Secretary of Revenue or a designee of the Secretary of Revenue who shall be an employee of the Department of Revenue.(4) The Secretary of Transportation or a designee of the Secretary of Transportation who shall be an employee of the Department of Transportation.(5) The chairperson of the Pennsylvania Public Utility Commission or a designee of the chairperson of the Pennsylvania Public Utility Commission who shall be a commissioner of the Pennsylvania Public Utility Commission.(6) The following individuals appointed in accordance with subsection (b):(i) A producer of petroleum-based diesel fuel within this Commonwealth.(ii) A producer of petroleum-based diesel fuel 20250HB2063PN2647 - 9 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 outside this Commonwealth.(iii) A producer of petroleum-based gasoline within this Commonwealth.(iv) A producer of petroleum-based gasoline outside this Commonwealth.(v) Two producers of renewable natural gas within this Commonwealth.(vi) Two producers or suppliers of renewable diesel fuel within this Commonwealth.(vii) Two producers or suppliers of renewable propane within this Commonwealth.(viii) An electric utility headquartered in this Commonwealth.(ix) A natural gas utility headquartered in this Commonwealth.(x) A distributor of deliverable fuels that is not an obligated party.(xi) A representative of a consumer organization that represents residential consumers.(xii) A representative of a consumer organization that represents industrial and commercial consumers.(xiii) A representative of an environmental organization.(b) Appointments.--The members of the board enumerated under subsection (a)(6) shall be appointed as follows, after consultation and coordination:(1) The President pro tempore of the Senate shall appoint five members.(2) The Speaker of the House of Representatives shall appoint five members.20250HB2063PN2647 - 10 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (3) The Minority Leader of the Senate shall appoint three members.(4) The Minority Leader of the House of Representatives shall appoint three members.Section 303. Terms.(a) Three-year term.--Subject to subsection (b), a member of the board appointed under section 302(a)(6) shall serve a term of three years and until a successor of the member is appointed.(b) Limitation.--A member of the board appointed under section 302(a)(6) may only be appointed to three three-year terms.Section 304. Officers.The members of the board shall select a chairperson and vice chairperson of the board from the members appointed under section 302(a)(6).Section 305. Quorum and voting.(a) Quorum.--A majority of the members of the board shall constitute a quorum to conduct official business.(b) Majority vote.--Action of the board shall be authorized or ratified by a majority vote of the members of the board.Section 306. Vacancies.(a) Manner.--A vacancy on the board shall be filled in the same manner as the original appointment.(b) Term.--A member of the board appointed in accordance with section 302(b)(6) to fill a vacancy on the board shall be appointed for the unexpired term and, subject to section 303(b), may be subsequently appointed to a full term.Section 307. Compensation and expenses.The members of the board shall not be entitled to compensation for their service as members of the board but shall 20250HB2063PN2647 - 11 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 be entitled to reasonable expenses incurred in the performance of their duties as members of the board.Section 308. Proceedings.The board shall document considerations and dissenting opinions regarding matters discussed during its meetings.Section 309. Transparency.The proceedings of the board and any information, documents, materials and copies produced by the board shall be subject to 65 Pa.C.S. Ch. 7 (relating to open meetings) and shall be accessible for inspection and duplication in accordance with the act of February 14, 2008 (P.L.6, No.3), known as the Right-to-Know Law.Section 310. Powers and duties.The board shall have the following powers and duties:(1) Promulgate rulemakings necessary to carry out the purposes of this act.(2) Perform a review of the rulemaking conducted under this act every three years, which shall include:(i) A review of the economic impact of the clean fuels standards.(ii) An opinion as to whether the clean fuels standards are adhering to the established carbon intensity targets.(iii) A recommendation regarding whether the board should consider any adjustment to the carbon intensity targets in accordance with sections 501(d) and 502(c).(iv) A recommendation regarding the need to update the GREET model used, including the procedures, guidelines and user-friendly interface of the GREET model in accordance with section 504(e).20250HB2063PN2647 - 12 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (v) A recommendation regarding the need to update any of the ASTM standards used.(vi) A recommendation regarding the need to update any other standard used under this act to carry out the purposes of this act.CHAPTER 5STANDARDSSection 501. Transportation fuels.(a) Establishment of clean fuels standards.--The board shall establish clean fuels standards for transportation fuels that consists of separate carbon intensity targets for aviation fuel, gasoline and diesel fuel.(b) Carbon intensity targets.--(1) The carbon intensity targets under the clean fuels standard under this section shall be based on the baseline carbon intensity values calculated in accordance with section 504(b).(2) The carbon intensity targets under the clean fuels standard for gasoline and diesel fuel shall:(i) Decrease each year to meet the overall level described in subparagraph (ii).(ii) Require that the aggregate carbon intensity of gasoline and diesel fuel used in this Commonwealth be reduced to 15% below the transportation fuel baseline no later than 10 years following the rulemaking initially conducted in accordance with section 901.(c) Aviation fuel.--The clean fuels standard for aviation fuel:(1) Shall only be used to calculate the credits that a fuel supplier of sustainable aviation fuel accrues when the 20250HB2063PN2647 - 13 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 fuel supplier opts in to abide by the requirements of this act.(2) Shall not be subject to the carbon intensity targets described under subsection (b)(2).(d) Review and adjustment.--(1) The board may adjust the clean fuels standard under this section only as provided in this subsection.(2) No later than three years following the establishment of the clean fuels standard under this section, and every three years thereafter, the board, in coordination with the department, shall:(i) Review the clean fuels standard.(ii) Determine the extent to which the target reductions specified under the clean fuels standard have been met.(iii) Determine whether any adjustment is necessary to achieve the target reductions under the clean fuels standard, taking into consideration:(A) Technologies available to achieve the clean fuels standard.(B) The need to maintain transportation fuel quality and availability.(3) Upon making any adjustment to the clean fuels standard under this section, the board shall transmit notice of the adjustment to the Legislative Reference Bureau for publication in the next available issue of the Pennsylvania Bulletin.(4) An adjustment to the clean fuels standard under this section shall be effective upon publication of the notice under paragraph (3) and in accordance with section 901.20250HB2063PN2647 - 14 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Section 502. Heating fuels.(a) Establishment of clean fuels standard.-The board shall establish a clean fuels standard for heating fuels.(b) Carbon intensity targets.--(1) The carbon intensity targets under the clean fuels standard under this section shall be based on the baseline carbon intensity values calculated in accordance with section 504(b).(2) The carbon intensity targets under the clean fuels standard for heating fuels shall:(i) Decrease each year to meet the overall level described in subparagraph (ii).(ii) Require that the aggregate carbon intensity of heating fuels used in this Commonwealth be reduced to 15% below the heating fuel baseline no later than 10 years following the final adoption of the rulemaking initially conducted in accordance with this act.(c) Review and adjustment.--(1) The board may adjust the clean fuels standard under this section only as provided in this subsection.(2) No later than three years following the establishment of the clean fuels standard under this section, and every three years thereafter, the board, in coordination with the department, shall:(i) Review the clean fuels standard.(ii) Determine the extent to which the target reductions specified under the clean fuels standard have been met.(iii) Determine whether any adjustment is necessary to achieve the target reductions under the clean fuels 20250HB2063PN2647 - 15 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 standard, taking into consideration:(A) Technologies available to achieve the clean fuels standard.(B) The need to maintain heating fuel quality and availability.(3) Upon making any adjustment to the clean fuels standard under this section, the board shall transmit notice of the adjustment to the Legislative Reference Bureau for publication in the next available issue of the Pennsylvania Bulletin.(4) An adjustment to the clean fuels standard under this section shall be effective upon publication of the notice under paragraph (3).Section 503. Implementation.(a) Postponement prohibited.--Neither the board nor the department may postpone any provision of this act except as provided in this act.(b) Rulemaking.--The clean fuels standards for transportation fuels and heating fuels shall be established through rulemaking developed by the board and officially promulgated in accordance with the act of June 25, 1982 (P.L.633, No.181), known as the Regulatory Review Act.Section 504. GREET model and carbon intensity.(a) Use of GREET model generally.--(1) Carbon intensity values for transportation fuels and heating fuels shall be calculated using the GREET model.(2) The same version of the GREET model shall be used to calculate carbon intensity values for transportation fuels and heating fuels.(3) The version of the GREET model may only be updated 20250HB2063PN2647 - 16 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 during the designated review periods in accordance with subsection (e).(b) Baseline carbon intensity values.--(1) The board shall calculate the baseline carbon intensity values of gasoline, diesel fuel and aviation fuel supplied for use in this Commonwealth in 2005, using the default input data from the GREET model, including representative United States average values for the use of on-road gasoline and diesel fuel and aviation fuel.(2) The baseline carbon intensity values under paragraph (1) shall:(i) Be used to determine the carbon intensity targets set by the clean fuels standard under section 501.(ii) Remain unchanged even if there are updates to the GREET model.(c) Default carbon intensity values.--(1) The board shall calculate the default carbon intensity values for fuels, using the default values in the GREET model for key methodology choices and assumptions, including, but not limited to, the following:(i) Yields.(ii) Process input quantities.(iii) Energy input quantities.(iv) Chemical and co-product allocations.(v) Indirect land use change.(vi) Carbon capture and storage.(2) The default carbon intensity values may be updated only during designated review periods in accordance with subsection (e).20250HB2063PN2647 - 17 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (d) Fuel pathway application.--(1) A program participant may request a carbon intensity value for a specific fuel pathway, by providing input data representative of the actual operations of the program participant, which may be different from the default values in the GREET model for key methodology choices and assumptions, including, but not limited to, the following:(i) Yields.(ii) Process input quantities.(iii) Energy input quantities.(iv) Chemical and fertilizer input quantities.(v) Lower emission factor alternatives for feedstock and fuel production, including, but not limited to, the following:(A) Renewable natural gas.(B) Renewable diesel fuel.(C) Carbon capture and sequestration.(D) Lower carbon intensity hydrogen.(2) The board shall verify and approve the request for a carbon intensity value for a specific fuel pathway by program participants under paragraph (1).(3) The department, as directed by the board, shall develop procedures, guidelines and a user-friendly interface with the GREET model, in consultation with experts from the Argonne National Laboratory, for program participants to use to provide the input data under paragraph (1).(4) The use of carbon intensity values calculated for fuel pathways using an immediate previous version of the GREET model shall be permitted for a 12-month period if, during the designated review periods under subsection (e), 20250HB2063PN2647 - 18 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 the board adopts the most recent GREET model consistent with this act.(5) A third-party verification and certification shall be used by the board for each fuel pathway application of a program participant in order to verify and approve the pathways under paragraph (2).(e) Review and adjustment.--(1) No later than three years following the establishment of the clean fuels standards in accordance with sections 501 and 502, and every three years thereafter, the board, in coordination with the department, shall review the GREET model used to calculate the carbon intensity values under this section.(2) If the GREET model has changed since the last review period, the board shall:(i) Issue a recommendation to update the GREET model used to calculate carbon intensity values to the newest version of the GREET model in accordance with section 901.(ii) Adjust the default carbon intensity values calculated in accordance with subsection (c) using the updated version of the GREET model.(iii) Use the updated version of the GREET model for future fuel pathway applications.(iv) Direct the department to update the procedures, guidelines and the user-friendly interface with the GREET model for program participants to provide the input data in accordance with subsection (d).(v) Permit the continued use of carbon intensity values for fuel pathways using the immediate previous 20250HB2063PN2647 - 19 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 version of the GREET model for a 12-month period.(3) The board shall transmit notice of each adjustment made under paragraph (2) to the Legislative Reference Bureau for publication in the next available issue of the Pennsylvania Bulletin.(4) An adjustment under this subsection shall be effective upon publication of the notice under paragraph (3).Section 505. Exemptions and eligibility.(a) Exemptions.--Subject to subsection (b), the following fuels are exempt from the clean fuels standards under sections 501 and 502:(1) Aviation fuel.(2) Transportation fuel used in locomotives.(3) Transportation fuel used in watercrafts.(4) Transportation fuel used in off-road applications, including mining and agriculture.(5) Fuel used in military tactical vehicles and tactical support equipment owned by the United States Department of Defense or the United States Armed Forces that could be used as transportation fuel.(b) Eligibility.--Fuel suppliers of the fuels described in subsection (a) for use in this Commonwealth, if deemed to be clean fuels, including sustainable aviation fuel, shall be eligible to receive credits on an opt-in basis that may be applied to future compliance years or sold to obligated parties in accordance with section 703(c).CHAPTER 7FAIR MARKET CREDIT TRADING PROGRAMSection 701. Establishment.(a) Authorization.--The Fair Market Credit Trading Program 20250HB2063PN2647 - 20 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 is established in the department.(b) Implementation.--The department may retain an independent third party to implement the trading program.Section 702. Components.The trading program shall include:(1) Cost-containment measures, including a pricing cap and a credit clearance market.(2) A mechanism to enable credits to be bought and sold among obligated parties and credit generators.(3) The ability to use indirect accounting methods, including mass balancing or book and claim for clean fuels or feedstocks for the production of clean fuels entering fungible supply systems that can access this Commonwealth under the established requirements.(4) The ability to bank credits for future compliance years and hold credits for a period not exceeding five years.(5) Procedures for verifying the validity of credits and deficits.Section 703. Participation.(a) Registration.--(1) To participate in the trading program, a program participant must register with the department by submitting:(i) An application on a form and in the manner prescribed by the board.(ii) The annual fee, as the board prescribes, which shall only be sufficient enough to cover the costs of the administration and enforcement of this act.(2) The initial period to register in accordance with paragraph (1) shall be at least 12 months following the publication of the final rulemaking establishing the clean 20250HB2063PN2647 - 21 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 fuels standards for transportation fuels and heating fuels.(3) During the initial 12-month period, obligated parties shall not incur any deficits.(b) Balancing credits and deficits.--After the initial 12-month registration period described in subsection (a), an obligated party shall demonstrate compliance with the applicable clean fuels standards by balancing credits and deficits, through obtaining and retiring credits, on an annual basis, as prescribed by the board.(c) Credits.--(1) The mechanism for the generation of credits under the trading program shall be technology neutral.(2) Credit opportunities may not be expressly excluded.(3) Credit and deficit generation shall be based only on life-cycle emissions using emission calculation methods in accordance with this act. Any multipliers or adjustments for credits or deficits that are inherently not technology neutral may not be used.(4) A project operator may generate project credits, which may be used to offset deficits.(5) The department shall allow the generation of credits, for use in future compliance years, during the initial 12-month registration period described in subsection (a).(d) Deficits.--After the end of the registration period described in subsection (a), obligated parties shall begin generating deficits under the clean fuels standards.(e) Third-party verifications.--(1) The department shall implement and administer a verification process, to be used by an independent third 20250HB2063PN2647 - 22 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 party designated by the department, to determine the following on an annual basis:(i) Compliance with the applicable clean fuels standards under sections 501 and 502.(ii) Credit generation under this section.(2) The department shall require third-party verification of fuel pathway applications.(3) The department shall develop an accreditation process for a designated independent third party to be a verifier, which must permit the use of verification entities accredited by another state that has adopted a clean fuels standard.(f) Opt-in participation.--Clean fuel versions of exempt fuels under section 505(a), including sustainable aviation fuel, are eligible to generate credits on an opt-in basis.CHAPTER 9MISCELLANEOUS PROVISIONSSection 901. Rulemaking.(a) Contents.--The board shall promulgate any rulemaking necessary to implement, administer and enforce the provisions of this act, including:(1) The establishment of baseline carbon intensity values in accordance with section 504(b).(2) The establishment of an annual reduction in carbon intensity targets from the transportation fuel and heating fuel sectors to meet the overall carbon intensity targets in accordance with sections 501 and 502.(3) The use of the GREET model to determine the default carbon intensity for fuels while facilitating an orderly transition between any model updates in accordance with 20250HB2063PN2647 - 23 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 section 504(c) and (e).(4) The use of the GREET model to determine the carbon intensity for fuels based on input data provided by a program participant in accordance with section 504(d).(5) The establishment of a process for fuel pathway application for fuels in accordance with section 504(d).(6) The establishment of a process for obligated parties to comply with the clean fuels standards by obtaining and retiring credits in accordance with section 703.(7) The establishment of a technology-neutral mechanism for the generation of credits in accordance with section 703(c).(8) The establishment of a process to allow a project operator to generate project credits in accordance with section 703(c).(9) The establishment of a process to recognize voluntary on-farm emissions reductions that contribute to the reduced carbon intensity of fuels.(10) The enabling of clean fuel versions of exempt fuels under section 505(a), including sustainable aviation fuel, to be eligible to generate credits on an opt-in basis in accordance with section 703(f).(11) The registration of program participants.(12) The establishment of an annual fee for program participants in accordance with section 703.(13) After the initial 12-month registration period described in section 703(a), requiring obligated parties to demonstrate compliance with the clean fuels standards by balancing credits and deficits on an annual basis in accordance with section 703.20250HB2063PN2647 - 24 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (14) The establishment of the trading program in accordance with section 701.(15) Third-party certifications of fuel pathway applications under section 504(d)(5).(16) Third-party verifications under section 703(e)(1).(17) The accreditation process under section 703(e)(3).(b) Temporary regulations.--(1) To facilitate the prompt implementation of this act, the board shall promulgate temporary regulations that shall expire no later than two years following the publication of the temporary regulations.(2) The temporary regulations under this subsection shall not be subject to:(i) Section 612 of the act of April 9, 1929 (P.L.177, No.175), known as The Administrative Code of 1929.(ii) Sections 201, 202, 203, 204 and 205 of the act of July 31, 1968 (P.L.769, No.240), referred to as the Commonwealth Documents Law.(iii) Sections 204(b) and 301(10) of the act of October 15, 1980 (P.L.950, 164), known as the Commonwealth Attorneys Act.(iv) The act of June 25, 1982 (P.L.633, No.181), known as the Regulatory Review Act.(3) The board's authority to adopt temporary regulations under this subsection shall expire two years after the effective date of this paragraph. Rulemaking adopted after this period shall be promulgated as provided by law.Section 902. Reports.The department shall issue a report to the General Assembly 20250HB2063PN2647 - 25 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 on an annual basis that:(1) Details the progress of the initial rulemaking process. Subsequent reports to the General Assembly shall provide details of any rulemaking changes by the board that are undertaken or that have been promulgated after the most recent prior report.(2) Assesses the availability and forecast of fuels in this Commonwealth.(3) Assesses the status of clean fuel production in this Commonwealth.(4) Assesses the reduction in carbon intensity from the transportation fuel and heating fuel sectors.(5) Assesses the economic impact of this act in this Commonwealth.Section 903. Co-compliance.A clean fuel that is used to generate credits under this act as prescribed may also generate credits under any overlapping Federal or State program, including, but not limited to, Renewable Identification Numbers under the United States Renewable Fuel Standard.Section 904. Compliance waiver.(a) Authorization.--The secretary may waive all obligations under this act for one compliance year if any of the following apply:(1) A declaration of disaster emergency is issued by the Governor in accordance with 35 Pa.C.S. § 7301(c) (relating to general authority of Governor).(2) The board finds, and transmits notice of the finding to the Legislative Reference Bureau for publication in the next available issue of the Pennsylvania Bulletin, based on 20250HB2063PN2647 - 26 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 the reports described in section 902, that a fuel supply shortage exists or may exist in this Commonwealth and the fuel supply shortage:(i) is, or is likely to be, of significant scope and duration, and of an emergency nature; and(ii) causes, or may cause, a major adverse impact on public health, safety or welfare or on the economy.(b) Application.--If the secretary issues a waiver order under this section, the waiver order shall apply to all obligated parties.(c) Termination.--After the termination of a waiver order under this section, the schedule of carbon intensity targets as established by the clean fuels standards under this act of the next compliance year, and all subsequent years, shall remain in effect without adjustment.Section 905. Preemption.(a) Act of General Assembly.--An act of the General Assembly in effect prior to, on or after the effective date of this subsection shall not preempt the utilization of any transportation fuel or heating fuel.(b) Political subdivision.--A political subdivision shall not adopt or enforce any ordinance, regulation or resolution that may preempt the utilization of any transportation fuel or heating fuel.(c) Transportation fuels.--The provisions of this act, in relation to transportation fuels, shall be preempted if a Federal clean fuels standard for transportation fuels is enacted.(d) Heating fuels.--The provisions of this act, in relation to heating fuels, shall be preempted if a Federal clean fuels 20250HB2063PN2647 - 27 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 standard for heating fuels is enacted.Section 906. Effective date.This act shall take effect as follows:(1) The following shall take effect in 60 days:Chapter 1.Section 901.(2) This section shall take effect immediately.(3) The remainder of this act shall take effect upon the publication of the temporary regulations in accordance with section 901(b).20250HB2063PN2647 - 28 - 12345678910